Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXIV Descent, Wills, and Administration of Decedents’ Estates
CHAPTER 394 Wills

394.010.
“Will” defined.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise, “will” means a last will or testament, codicil, appointment by will, writing in the nature of a will in exercise of a power, and any other testamentary disposition.

History.

4824: amend. Acts 1964, ch. 128, § 1 (1).

394.020.
Persons competent to make — What may be disposed of.

Any person of sound mind and eighteen (18) years of age or over may by will dispose of any estate, right, or interest in real or personal estate that he may be entitled to at his death, which would otherwise descend to his heirs or pass to his personal representatives, even though he becomes so entitled after the execution of his will.

History.

2147, 4825, 4827: amend. Acts 1964, ch. 21, § 4.

394.030.
Minor can make will, when.

No person under eighteen (18) years of age can make any will, except in pursuance of a power specially given to that effect, and except also, that a parent, though under eighteen (18) years of age, may by will appoint a guardian for his child.

History.

4826: amend. Acts 1964, ch. 21, § 5; 1974, ch. 386, § 86.

394.035.
Uniform disclaimer of transfers under nontestamentary instruments.

A person, or the representative of an incapacitated person or protected person, who is a grantee, donee, surviving joint tenant, person succeeding to a disclaimed interest, beneficiary under a nontestamentary instrument or contract, or appointee under a power of appointment exercised by a nontestamentary instrument, may disclaim in whole or in part the right of transfer to him of any property, or interest therein by delivering or filing a written disclaimer under this section. A surviving joint tenant may disclaim as a separate interest any property or interest therein devolving to him by right of survivorship. A surviving joint tenant may disclaim the entire interest in any property, or interest therein, that is the subject of a joint tenancy devolving to him, if the joint tenancy was created by act of a deceased joint tenant, if the survivor did not join in creating the joint tenancy and he has not accepted a benefit thereunder. The right to disclaim shall survive the death of the person having it and may be exercised by the personal representative of such person’s estate. The disclaimer shall describe the property or interest therein disclaimed, declare the disclaimer and extent thereof, and be signed by the disclaimant.

An instrument disclaiming a present interest shall be delivered or filed no later than nine (9) months after the effective date of the nontestamentary instrument or contract; and a future interest shall be delivered or filed not later than nine (9) months after the event determining that the taker of the property or interest is finally ascertained and his interest is indefeasibly vested. If the person entitled to disclaim does not have actual knowledge of the existence of the interest the instrument shall be delivered or filed not later than nine (9) months after he has actual knowledge of the existence of the interest. The effective date of a revocable instrument or contract is the date on which the maker no longer has power to revoke it or to transfer to himself or another the entire legal and equitable ownership of the interest.

The disclaimer or a copy thereof shall be delivered in person or mailed by registered or certified mail to the transferor or his representative or to the trustee or other person having legal title to, or possession of, the property or interest disclaimed. If real property or an interest therein is disclaimed, a copy of the instrument may be filed for record in the office of the county clerk of the county in which the real estate is situated.

Unless the nontestamentary instrument or contract provides for another disposition, the property or interest therein disclaimed shall devolve as if the disclaimant had died before the effective date of the instrument or contract. A disclaimer relates back for all purposes to that date. A future interest that takes effect in possession or enjoyment at or after the termination of the disclaimed interest takes effect as if the disclaimant had died before the effective date of the instrument or contract that transferred the disclaimed interest.

The right to disclaim property or an interest therein is barred by an assignment, conveyance, encumbrance, pledge, or transfer of the property or interest, or a contract therefor, a written waiver of the right to disclaim, an acceptance of the property or interest or benefit thereunder, or a sale of the property or interest under judicial sale made before the disclaimer is effected.

The right to disclaim exists notwithstanding any limitation on the interest of the disclaimant in the nature of a spendthrift provision or similar restriction.

The instrument of disclaimer or the written waiver of the right to disclaim is binding upon the disclaimant or person waiving and all persons claiming through or under him.

This section does not abridge the right of a person to waive, release, disclaim, or renounce property or an interest therein under any other statute.

An interest in property existing on July 15, 1980, as to which, if a present interest, the time for filing a disclaimer under this section has not expired, or if a future interest, the interest has not become indefeasibly vested or the taker finally ascertained, may be disclaimed within nine (9) months after July 15, 1980.

This section shall be applied and construed to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law with respect to the subject of this section among states enacting it.

This section may be cited as the uniform disclaimer of transfers under nontestamentary instruments section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 259, § 10, effective July 15, 1980.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Bozell, Disclaimer Trusts: A Flexible Choice for Many Couples in the Face of an Uncertain Future for the Estate Tax, Vol. 70, No. 1, January 2006, Ky. Bench & Bar 7.

Kentucky Law Journal.

Bratt, A Primer on Kentucky Intestacy Laws, 82 Ky. L.J. 29 (1993-94).

394.040.
Requisites of a valid will.

No will is valid unless it is in writing with the name of the testator subscribed thereto by himself, or by some other person in his presence and by his direction. If the will is not wholly written by the testator, the subscription shall be made or the will acknowledged by him in the presence of at least two (2) credible witnesses, who shall subscribe the will with their names in the presence of the testator, and in the presence of each other.

History.

4828: amend. Acts 1978, ch. 85, § 1, effective June 17, 1978.

394.050.
Soldier or sailor may make nuncupative will, how. [Repealed.]

394.060.
Devise or bequest extends to an execution of power. [Repealed]

History.

4845: amend. Acts 1972, ch. 168, § 8; repealed by 2020 ch. 41, § 40, effective July 15, 2020.

394.065.
Validity of trust, devise or legacy not affected by specified provisions.

No writing declaring and creating a trust, including a life insurance trust, when otherwise valid, shall be an invalid trust or a testamentary disposition of property because the grantor of the trust reserves to himself: (a) the income of the trust estate for his life, or any other period, or the right to receive the income of the trust estate or have it used for his benefit for his life, or any other period, whether at the grantor’s direction or in the trustee’s discretion; and/or (b) the right to receive amounts of the trust principal or have such amounts used for his benefit whether at the grantor’s direction or in the discretion of the trustee; and/or (c) the right, at any time during his lifetime, to modify, alter, amend or revoke the trust instrument, in whole or in part; and/or (d) the right, at any time during his lifetime, to make recommendations to or direct the trustee as to any or all investments of the trustee and any or all administrative or other functions of the trustee.

Subsection (1) above shall be applicable to all writings executed after its enactment and to all writings previously executed if the grantor is living at the time of its enactment.

History.

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 128, § 1 (1), (3).

394.070.
Appointment by will in exercise of a power — When valid. [Repealed]

History.

4829; repealed by 2020 ch. 41, § 40, effective July 15, 2020.

394.075.
Uniform Testamentary Additions to Trusts Act. [Repealed.]

394.076.
Uniform testamentary additions to trust act.

A will may validly transfer property to the trustee of a trust:

Established during the testator’s lifetime by the testator, by the testator and one (1) or more other persons, or by one (1) or more other persons, including a funded or unfunded life insurance trust, although one (1) or more persons other than the trustee have reserved any or all rights of ownership of the insurance contracts; or

Established at the testator’s death by the testator’s transfer to the trustee, if the trust is identified in the testator’s will and its terms are set forth in a written instrument, other than a will, executed before, concurrently with, or after the execution of the testator’s will or in another individual’s will if that other individual has predeceased the testator, regardless of the existence, size, or character of the corpus of the trust.

A transfer referred to in subsection (1) of this section shall not be invalid because the trust is amendable or revocable, or because the trust was amended after the execution of the will or the testator’s death.

Unless the testator’s will provides otherwise, property transferred to a trust in accordance with subsection (1) of this section shall not be held under a testamentary trust of the testator but shall become a part of the trust to which it is transferred. The property shall be administered and disposed of in accordance with the provisions of the governing instrument setting forth the terms of the trust, including any amendments to it made before or after the testator’s death.

Unless the testator’s will provides otherwise, a revocation or termination of the trust before the testator’s death shall cause the devise or bequest to lapse.

This section shall be effective for any devise or bequest made by wills of decedents dying on or after July 15, 1998.

This section shall be construed to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law of those states that enact it.

This section may be cited as the Uniform Testamentary Additions to Trusts Act.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 415, § 10, effective July 15, 1998.

394.080.
Revocation of will — How effected.

No will or codicil, or any part thereof, shall be revoked, except:

By subsequent will or codicil;

By some writing declaring an intention to revoke the will or codicil, and executed in the manner in which a will is required to be executed; or

By the person who made the will, or some person in his presence and by his direction, cutting, tearing, burning, obliterating, canceling, or destroying the will or codicil, or the signature thereto, with the intent to revoke.

History.

4833: amend. Acts 1974, ch. 299, § 3; 1982, ch. 361, § 2, effective July 15, 1982; 1998, ch. 408, § 2, effective July 15, 1998.

394.090.
Nonrevocation of will by marriage of testator.

A will shall not be revoked by the marriage of the person who made the will.

History.

4832: amend. Acts 1974, ch. 18, § 1; 1988, ch. 90, § 4, effective July 15, 1988; 1998, ch. 408, § 1, effective July 15, 1998.

394.092.
Effect of divorce or annulment of marriage of testator.

If after executing a will the testator is divorced or his marriage annulled, the divorce or annulment revokes any disposition or appointment of property made by the will to the former spouse, any provision conferring a general or special power of appointment on the former spouse, and any nomination of the former spouse as executor, trustee, conservator or guardian, unless the will expressly provides otherwise. Property prevented from passing to a former spouse because of revocation by divorce or annulment passes as if the former spouse failed to survive the decedent, and other provisions conferring some power or office on the former spouse are interpreted as if the spouse failed to survive the decedent. If provisions are revoked solely by this section, they are revived by the testator’s remarriage to the former spouse.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 361, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; 1990, ch. 450, § 4, effective July 13, 1990.

394.095.
Divorce revokes will — Exception. [Repealed.]

394.100.
Revoked will may be revived, how.

A will or codicil, or part thereof, that has been revoked shall be revived only by reexecution or by a codicil executed in the manner required for making a will, and then only to the extent to which an intention to revive is shown thereby.

History.

4834.

394.110.
Will may be deposited with clerk for safekeeping. [Repealed]

History.

4865: amend. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 354, effective January 2, 1978; 1978, ch. 84, § 23, effective June 17, 1978; repealed by 2019 ch. 99, § 1, effective June 27, 2019.

394.120.
Validity of nonresident’s will.

The will of a person domiciled out of this state at the time of his death shall be valid as to his personal property and his real property in this state, if it is executed according to the law of the place where he was domiciled.

History.

4831: amend. Acts 1972, ch. 168, § 9.

394.130.
Will not admissible as evidence until probated — Effect of probate.

No will shall be received in evidence until it has been allowed and admitted to record by a District Court; and its probate before such court shall be conclusive, except as to the jurisdiction of the court, until superseded, reversed or annulled.

History.

4852: amend. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 355, effective January 2, 1978.

394.140.
Will probated in District Court — Venue.

Wills shall be proved before, and admitted to record by, the District Court of the testator’s residence (if such residence was on a United States Army post, military reservation or fort, it may be proved and admitted to record in the District Court of any county adjacent thereto); if he had no known place of residence in this state, and land is devised, then in the county where the land or part thereof lies; if no land is devised, then in the county where he died, or where his estate or part thereof is, or where there is a debt or demand owing to him.

History.

4849: amend. Acts 1964, ch. 156; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 356, effective January 2, 1978.

394.145.
Application for probate of will.

When any will is offered for probate, the court shall require a verified application to be filed by the person offering the same. Such application shall state the residence of the testator at the time of his death and such other facts as may be necessary to establish the jurisdiction of the court, and the names, ages and post office addresses of the testator’s surviving spouse and, if required by the court, heirs at law, or such as are known. An application for probate and for appointment as executor or administrator with the will annexed may be combined in one (1) application.

History.

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 167, § 6; 1968, ch. 200, § 6; 1972, ch. 168, § 10; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 357, effective January 2, 1978.

394.150.
Probate of nonresident’s will.

When a will of a nonresident has been proved out of the state, an authenticated copy and the certificate of probate may be offered for probate in this state. When such copy is offered the court shall presume, in the absence of evidence to the contrary, that the will was duly executed and admitted to probate as a will in the state or country of the testator’s domicile, and shall admit the copy to probate as a will in this state.

History.

4854: amend. Acts 1972, ch. 168, § 11.

394.160.
Court may compel production of a will.

Any District Court, on being informed that a person has in his custody the will of a testator, may summon him, and, by proper process, compel him to produce it.

History.

4853: amend. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 358, effective January 2, 1978.

394.170.
Propounder of will may have interested parties summoned.

A person offering or intending to offer to a District Court a will for probate may obtain from the clerk of the court process directed to the proper officer of any county, requiring him to summon any person interested in the probate to appear and show cause why the will should not be admitted to record.

History.

4856: amend. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 359, effective January 2, 1978.

394.180.
Court may order interested parties summoned.

The court to which a will is offered for probate may cause all persons interested in the probate to be summoned to appear on a certain day.

History.

4857.

394.190.
Summons or warning order — Persons under disability.

Any person interested in such probate may be summoned, or proceeded against by warning order, and if an infant or mentally disabled person, a guardian ad litem shall be appointed.

History.

4858: amend. Acts 1982, ch. 141, § 104, effective July 1, 1982.

394.200.
Creditors and executors are competent witnesses.

If a will charging any estate with debts is attested by a creditor, or the wife or husband of a creditor, whose debt is so charged, the creditor shall be a competent witness for or against the will.

No person shall, on account of his being an executor of a will, be incompetent as a witness for or against the will.

History.

4837, 4838.

394.210.
Attesting witness — Effect of subsequent incompetency of or devise to.

If any person who attests the execution of a will shall, after its execution, become incompetent to be admitted as a witness to prove its execution, the will shall not, on that account, be invalid.

If a will is attested by a person to whom, or to whose wife or husband, any beneficial interest in the estate is devised or bequeathed, and the will cannot otherwise be proved, such person shall be deemed a competent witness; but such devise or bequest shall be void, unless such witness would be entitled to a share of the estate of the testator if the will were not established, in which case he shall receive so much of his share as does not exceed the value of that devised or bequeathed.

A will may be proved by the testimony of one (1) of the subscribing witnesses without regard to the availability or competency of the other witnesses, provided said will was acknowledged or subscribed by the testator in the presence of two (2) witnesses at the same time.

History.

4836: amend. Acts 1972, ch. 168, § 12.

394.220.
Court may probate will without summoning parties.

A District Court may, without summoning any party, proceed to probate and admit the will to record or reject it.

History.

4860: amend. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 360, effective January 2, 1978.

394.225.
Self-proved will.

Any will may be simultaneously executed, attested, and made self-proved, by acknowledgment thereof by the testator and affidavits of the witnesses, each made before an officer authorized to administer oaths under the laws of this state and evidenced by the officer’s certificate, in substantially the following form:

An attested will may, at any time subsequent to its execution, be made self-proved, by the acknowledgment thereof by the testator and the affidavits of the witnesses, each made before an officer authorized to administer oaths under the laws of this state, and evidenced by the officer’s certificate, attached or annexed to the will in form and content substantially as follows:

The execution of an acknowledgment of a will by a testator, and of the affidavits of witnesses, made before an officer authorized to administer oaths under the laws of this state and evidenced by the officer’s certificate substantially in the form set out in this section during the period between June 21, 1974, and the effective date of the 1982 amendments to this section shall be considered to be a valid execution and attestation of a written will even though the will was not signed and attested separately from the execution of the acknowledgment by the testator and the affidavits of the witnesses.

A self-proved will may be admitted to probate without the testimony of any subscribing witness, but otherwise treated no differently from a will not self-proved.

I, , the testator, sign my name to this instrument this day of , 19, and being first duly sworn, do hereby declare to the undersigned authority that I sign and execute this instrument as my last will and that I sign it willingly (or willingly direct another to sign for me), that I execute it as my free and voluntary act for the purposes therein expressed, and that I am eighteen (18) years of age or older, of sound mind, and under no constraint or undue influence. (Testator) We,, , the witnesses, sign our names to this instrument, being first duly sworn, and do hereby declare to the undersigned authority that the testator signs and executes this instrument as his last will and that he signs it willingly (or willingly directs another to sign for him), and that each of us, in the presence and hearing of the testator and in the presence of the other subscribing witness, hereby signs this will as witness to the testator’s signing, and that to the best of our knowledge the testator is eighteen (18) years of age or older, of sound mind, and under no constraint or undue influence. (Witness) (Witness) THE STATE OF COUNTY OF Subscribed, sworn to and acknowledged before me by , the testator and subscribed and sworn to before me by , and , witnesses, this day of . (Signed) (Signed) (OFFICIAL CAPACITY OF OFFICER)

Click to view

THE STATE OF COUNTY OF Before me, the undersigned authority, on this day personally appeared and known to me to be the testator and the witnesses, respectively, whose names are signed to the attached or foregoing instrument and, all of these persons being by me first duly sworn the testator, declared to me and to the witnesses in my presence that the instrument is his last will and that he had willingly signed or directed another to sign for him, and that he executed it as his free and voluntary act for the purposes therein expressed; and each of the witnesses stated to me, in the presence and hearing of the testator, that he signed the will as witness in the presence of the testator and of the other subscribing witness, and that to the best of his knowledge the testator was eighteen (18) years of age or over, of sound mind and under no constraint or undue influence. (Testator) (Witness) (Witness) (Witness) Subscribed, sworn and acknowledged before me by , the testator, subscribed and sworn before me by and ,witnesses, this day of , A.D., (OFFICIAL CAPACITY OF OFFICER)

Click to view

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 299, § 1; 1980, ch. 259, § 11, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 75, § 1, effective July 15, 1982.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Schneider, Self-Proved Wills in Kentucky: Problems and Recommendations, Vol. 45, No. 1, January 1981, Ky. Bench & Bar 22.

Kentucky Law Journal.

Kentucky Law Survey, Catron, Wills, Probate and Real Property Law, 71 Ky. L.J. 333 (1982-83).

Northern Kentucky Law Review.

Schneider, Self-Proved Wills — A Trap for the Unwary, 8 N. Ky. L. Rev. 539 (1981).

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Converting Will to Self-Proved, Form 230.10.

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Practice Context for Wills, § 230.00.

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Self-Proved Will, Form 230.09.

394.230.
Deposition of subscribing witness — When and how may be taken.

When any will or any authenticated copy, as provided in KRS

394.150

, is offered for probate, and an attesting witness resides out of this state, or though in the state is in confinement in another county under legal process, or is unable from sickness, age or other infirmity to attend the court before which the will or copy is offered, or resides at a distance of more than fifty (50) miles, the court may cause a commission to be issued, annexed to the will or copy and directed to any person authorized to take depositions, to take his deposition. The deposition of such witness shall be taken and certified as depositions are taken in other cases, except that no notice need be given of the time and place of taking, unless the probate is opposed by some person who has made himself a party. The proof so given shall have the same effect as if it had been given in the court from which the commission issued.

History.

4855.

394.235.
Proof of will where witnesses unavailable.

When it appears to the court that a will cannot be proven as otherwise provided by law because one (1) or more or all of the subscribing witnesses to the will, at the time the will is offered for probate, are serving in or present with the Armed Forces of the United States or as merchant seamen, or are dead or mentally or physically incapable of testifying or otherwise unavailable, the court may admit the will to probate upon the testimony in person or by deposition of at least two (2) credible disinterested witnesses that the signature to the will is in the handwriting of the person whose will it purports to be, or upon other sufficient proof of such handwriting. The foregoing provision shall not preclude the court, in its discretion, from requiring in addition, proof of such other pertinent facts and circumstances as the court may deem necessary to admit the will to probate.

History.

Enact. Acts 1944, ch. 101, § 1.

394.240.
Actions in Circuit Court — Time in which to be brought — Filing notice of proceeding.

Any person aggrieved by the action of the District Court in admitting a will to record or rejecting it may bring an original action in the Circuit Court of the same county to contest the action of the District Court. Such action shall be brought within two (2) years after the decision of the District Court. The parties may, in the same action, or in a separate action if the validity of the will is not in issue, seek construction, interpretation or reformation of a will.

Upon filing an adversary proceeding in Circuit Court in matters involving probate whether in a testate or intestate proceeding or an action pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the plaintiff shall forthwith lodge a notice of the action in the office of the county clerk of the county in which the will was admitted to probate or rejected, or if in an intestate estate in the office of the county clerk of the county in which the estate was probated. Such notice shall state the name of the testator, the style of the action, the court in which the action has been filed, the file number assigned to the action by the clerk of the court in which it has been filed, the nature of the action, and the date on which the action was commenced. Said notice shall be signed by plaintiff or his attorney and no jurat shall be necessary. The county clerk shall record and index said notice as if it were a will.

History.

4850: amend. Acts 1972, ch. 168, § 13; 1974, ch. 299, § 9; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 361, effective January 2, 1978; 1978, ch. 384, § 515, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 259, § 12, effective July 15, 1980.

394.250.
When action in circuit court stays proceedings under will — Court may stop distribution.

An action filed in the circuitcCourt, pursuant to KRS

394.240

, shall not, unless taken within twelve (12) months from the entry of the district court’s order, prevent the appointment of an administrator or executor by the district court or the settlement, distribution, and division of the decedent’s estate. The circuit court in which proceedings are pending may make an order restraining the further distribution and division of the estate. Should such a restraining order be made, the court may in its discretion require the plaintiffs to give bond as required by the Rules of Civil Procedure concerning injunctive relief in civil actions generally. Such an order shall not restrain administration of the estate other than as set out in the order.

History.

4851: amend. Acts 1974, ch. 299, § 8; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 362, effective January 2, 1978.

394.260.
Proceedings in Circuit Court.

When the proceeding is taken to the Circuit Court, all necessary parties shall be brought before the court by the plaintiff. The final decision given shall, subject to appeal to the Court of Appeals, be a bar to any other proceeding calling the probate or rejection of the will in question. This section does not preclude a court of justice from its jurisdiction to impeach such final decision for any reason that would give it jurisdiction over any other judgment at law.

History.

4859: amend. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 363, effective January 2, 1978; 1978, ch. 384, § 115, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 259, § 13, effective July 15, 1980.

394.270.
Evidence given on probate may be read at trial.

The record of what is proved or deposed in court by witnesses on the motion to admit a will to record, and any deposition lawfully taken out of court on such motion, of witnesses who cannot be produced at a trial in the Circuit Court before a jury, may, on such trial, be admitted as evidence, to have such weight as the jury thinks they deserve.

History.

4863.

394.280.
Nonresidents, persons not parties and infants may have retrial — Time — Extent of.

Any person interested who, at the time of the final decision in the Circuit Court, resided out of this state and was proceeded against by warning order only, without actual appearance or being personally served with process, and any other person interested who was not a party to the proceeding by actual appearance or being personally served with process, may, within three (3) years after the final decision in the Circuit Court, by petition in equity, impeach the decision and have a retrial of the question of probate; and either party shall be entitled to a jury for the trial thereof. An infant, not a party, shall not be barred of such proceeding in equity until twelve (12) months after attaining full age.

But no such proceeding in equity for establishing or avoiding a will shall operate further than is necessary to the rights of such infant, nonresident, or other party, or otherwise affect the rights of any other person interested in the probate.

History.

4861, 4862.

394.290.
Appeal to Court of Appeals. [Repealed.]

394.295.
Vacation or modification of judgment upon discovery of later will.

The court in which a judgment has been rendered shall have power to vacate or modify it when any paper purporting to be the last will of any person has been, or may be hereafter admitted to probate, and a later will has been discovered. A judgment on this ground, however, shall not be vacated or modified, unless proceedings to that end shall be instituted within ten (10) years after the death of the testator. If the earlier will shall have been established by judgment of the Circuit Court, the proceedings to vacate shall be instituted in the Circuit Court. The proceedings to vacate shall be by petition to which all persons interested in the earlier will shall be made defendants. Otherwise, the proceedings to vacate shall be instituted in the District Court. Provided, however, that a judgment on the ground herein named shall not be vacated or modified until the validity of such later will has been determined in such proceedings. When such former judgment has been vacated or modified such later will shall be admitted to probate in the manner and under the laws governing the probation of wills before the expiration of five (5) years. The judgment establishing such later will and vacating the judgment establishing the former will shall be without prejudice to the vested rights of innocent third parties. The court in which relief is sought for the reasons herein set out, may enter such orders as may be necessary to protect the rights of the parties during the pendency of the proceedings.

History.

C.C. 518(9): amend. Acts 1926, ch. 27; trans. and amend. Acts 1952, ch. 84, §§ 1, 20; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 364, effective January 2, 1978; 1980, ch. 259, § 14, effective July 15, 1980.

394.300.
Recording of wills.

Every will or authenticated copy admitted to record by any court shall be recorded by the county clerk, and remain in his office, except during such time as it may be carried to another court under subpoena duces tecum.

A will probated in the court of one (1) Kentucky county and recorded in the office of the county clerk for that county may be recorded in the office of the county clerk for other counties without the process of probate in the other county.

Production of an attested copy of the will together with an attested copy of the order of probate shall be required by the county clerk of the other county before recordation.

The clerk shall make the same charge for recordation as is otherwise provided for recording a will.

History.

4864: amend. Acts 1980, ch. 259, § 15, effective July 15, 1980.

Opinions of Attorney General.

A county judge could not appoint the librarian of a university as nominal deputy county clerk for the purpose of receiving, maintaining and displaying the original will of Henry Clay in the library.

OAG 71-46

.

Whether a will is that of nonresident of Kentucky mailed to a county clerk in this state from out-of-state, or the will of a resident so mailed, before it may be “recorded” by a county clerk in this state, it must be “admitted to record” (probated) in a District Court of this state. OAG

395.130

.

The phrase “any court,” as used in subsection (1) of this section, means any District Court in Kentucky.

OAG 94-48

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Practice Context for County Clerks, § 14.00.

394.310.
Original will may be withdrawn from court, when.

The District Court before which a will has been probated may permit any person interested to withdraw the will temporarily upon proper terms, if it is shown that the original will is necessary as evidence in any proceeding pending in a foreign government, or in any state of the United States. A copy of the will shall always be retained and entered upon the records of the court permitting the withdrawal.

History.

4866: amend. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 365, effective January 2, 1978.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The county court may not order the custody of a probated and recorded will to be given over to the husband of the decedent testatrix, unless the terms of this section are fulfilled.

OAG 72-153

.

394.320.
Devisee may disclaim by deed. [Repealed.]

394.330.
Will speaks as of time testator dies.

A will shall be construed, with reference to the real and personal estate comprised in it, to speak and take effect as if it had been executed immediately before the death of the testator, unless a contrary intention appears in the will.

History.

4839.

394.340.
General devise of land includes all interests therein owned by testator.

A devise of the land of the testator, or of the land of the testator in any place or occupied by any person mentioned in his will or otherwise described in a general manner, and any other general devise which would describe a leasehold estate, if the testator had no freehold estate which could be described by it, shall be construed to include his leasehold estates, or any of them to which the description extends, as well as freehold estates, unless a contrary intention appears in the will.

History.

4844.

394.350.
Conveyance or act subsequent to will — Effect as to interest owned at death.

No conveyance or other act subsequent to the execution of a will shall, unless it be an act by which the will is revoked, prevent its operation with respect to such interest in the estate comprised in the will as the testator would have power to dispose of by will at the time of his death.

History.

4835.

394.360.
Conversion or removal of devised property not an ademption unless intended.

The conversion of money or property or the proceeds of property, devised to one (1) of the testator’s heirs, into other property or thing, with or without the assent of the testator, shall not be an ademption of the legacy or devise unless the testator so intended; but the devisee shall have and receive the value of such devise, unless a contrary intention on the part of the testator appears from the will, or by parol or other evidence.

The removal of property devised shall not operate as an ademption, unless a contrary intention on the part of the testator is manifested in like manner.

History.

2068, 2069.

394.370.
Advancement, when deemed satisfaction of devise.

A provision for or advancement to any person shall be deemed a satisfaction in whole or in part of a devise or bequest to such person contained in a previous will, if it would be so deemed in case the devisee or legatee were the child of the testator; and whether he is a child or not, it shall be so deemed in all cases in which it appears from parol or other evidence to have been so intended.

History.

4840.

394.380.
Pretermitted child — Provisions concerning. [Repealed.]

394.382.
Share of pretermitted child.

If a testator fails to provide in his will for any of his children born or adopted after the execution of his will, the omitted child receives a share in the estate equal in value to that which he would have received if the testator had died intestate unless:

It appears from the will that the omission was intentional;

When the will was executed the testator had one (1) or more children and devised substantially all his estate to the other parent of the omitted child; or

The testator provided for the child by transfers outside the will and the intent that the transfers be in lieu of a testamentary provision is shown by statements of the testator or from the amount of the transfers or other evidence.

In satisfying a share provided for in this section, such share shall be taken ratably from the interest of heirs, devisees and legatees.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 168, § 2.

394.390.
Child or grandchild believed to be dead, or whose birth is not known to testator. [Repealed.]

394.400.
Issue of dead devisee or legatee take parent’s share.

If a devisee or legatee dies before the testator, or is dead at the making of the will, leaving issue who survive the testator, such issue shall take the estate devised or bequeathed, as the devisee or legatee would have done if he had survived the testator, unless a different disposition thereof is made or required by the will.

History.

4841.